Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.508C,
as last amended by Section 2, Chapter 297, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 1210.508C), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1210.508C. A. To identify students who have a reading
deficiency or characteristics of dyslexia that lead to or cause
reading difficulty, each student enrolled in kindergarten and first,
second, and third grade in a public school in this state shall be
screened at the beginning, middle, and end of each school year for
reading skills including, but not limited to, phonological
awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension. A
screening instrument approved by the State Board of Education, in
consultation with the Commission for Educational Quality and
Accountability and the Secretary of Education, shall be utilized for
the purposes of this section. In determining which screening
instrument to approve, the State Board of Education, the Commission
for Educational Quality and Accountability, and the Secretary of
Education shall take into consideration at a minimum the following
factors:
1. The time required to conduct the screening instrument with
the intention of minimizing the impact on instructional time;
Req. No. 14012 Page 2

2. The timeliness in reporting screening instrument results to
teachers, administrators, and parents and legal guardians of
students; and
3. The integration of the screening instrument into reading
curriculum.
B. Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, the State Board of
Education shall approve no fewer than three two screening
instruments for use at the beginning, middle, and end of the school
year for monitoring of progress and for measurement of reading
skills as required in subsection A of this section. The screening
instruments shall meet the following criteria:
1. Assess for phonological awareness, decoding, fluency,
vocabulary, and comprehension;
2. Document the validity and reliability of each assessment;
3. Can be used for identifying students who are at risk for
reading deficiency and progress monitoring throughout the school
year;
4. Can be used to assess students with disabilities and English
language learners; and
5. Accompanied by a data management system that provides
profiles of each student, class, grade level, and school building.
The profiles shall identify each student's instructional point of
need and reading achievement level. The State Board shall also

Req. No. 14012 Page 3

dete rmine other comparable reading assessments for diagnostic
purposes to be used for students at risk of reading failure.
C. 1. Exemptions to the screening requirements of this section
may be provided to students who have documented evidence that they
meet at least one of the following criteria as related to the
provision of classroom instruction:
a. the student participates in the Oklahoma Alternate
Assessment Program (OAAP) and is taught using
alternate methods,
b. the student's primary expressive or receptive
communication is sign language,
c. the student's primary form of written or read text is
Braille, or
d. the student's primary expressive or receptive language
is not English, the student is identified as an
English learner using a state-approved identification
assessment, and the student has had less than one (1)
school year of instruction in an English-learner
program.
2. A public school that grants an exemption pursuant to
paragraph 1 of this subsection shall provide ongoing evidence of
student progression toward English language acquisition with the
same frequency as administration of screening assessments. Evidence
may include, but not be limited to, student progression toward OAAP
Req. No. 14012 Page 4

read ing essential elements, proficiency in sign language and reading
comprehension, and proficiency in Braille and reading comprehension.
D. 1. Students who are administered a screening instrument
pursuant to subsection A of this section and are found not to be
meeting grade-level targets shall be provided a program of reading
instruction designed to enable students to acquire the appropriate
grade-level reading skills. The program of reading instruction
shall be based on scientific reading research and align with the
subject matter standards adopted by the State Board of Education. A
program of reading instruction shall include:
a. sufficient additional in-school instructional time for
the acquisition of phonological awareness, decoding,
fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension,
b. if necessary and if funding is available, tutorial
instruction after regular school hours, on Saturdays,
and during summer; however, such instruction may not
be counted toward the one-hundred-eighty-day or one-
thousand-eighty-hour school year required in Section
1-109 of this title,
c. assessments identified for diagnostic purposes and
periodic monitoring to measure the acquisition of
reading skills including, but not limited to,
phonological awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary,

Req. No. 14012 Page 5

and comprehension, as identified in the student's
program of reading instruction,
d. high-quality instructional materials grounded in
scientifically based reading research, and
e. a means of providing every family of a student in
prekindergarten, kindergarten, and first, second, and
third grade access to free online evidence-based
literacy instruction resources to support the
student's literacy development at home.
2. A student enrolled in kindergarten or first, second, or
third grade who exhibits a deficiency in reading at any time based
on the screening instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of
this section shall receive an individual reading intervention plan
no later than thirty (30) fifteen (15) days after the identification
of the deficiency in reading. The reading intervention plan shall
be provided in addition to core reading instruction that is provided
to all students. The reading intervention plan shall:
a. describe the research-based reading intervention
services the student will receive to remedy the
deficiency in reading,
b. provide explicit and systematic instruction in
phonological awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary,
and comprehension, as applicable, provided such
instruction shall not take place during the
Req. No. 14012 Page 6

instructional time for mathematics or other core
tested subjects,
c. monitor the reading progress of each student's reading
skills throughout the school year and adjust
instruction according to the student's needs and the
deficiencies identified by the screening instrument
described in subsection A of this section.
Instruction shall be specifically tailored and not
based on generic grade targets or standards, and
d. continue until the student is determined to be meeting
grade-level targets in reading based on screening
instruments administered pursuant to subsection A of
this section or assessments identified for diagnostic
purposes and periodic monitoring pursuant to
subparagraph c of paragraph 1 of this subsection.
3. The reading intervention plan for each student identified
with a deficiency in reading shall be developed by a Student Reading
Proficiency Team and shall include supplemental instructional
services and supports. Each team shall be composed of:
a. the parent or legal guardian of the student,
b. the teacher assigned to the student who had
responsibility for reading instruction in that
academic year,

Req. No. 14012 Page 7

c. a teacher who is responsible for reading instruction
and is assigned to teach in the next grade level of
the student, and
d. a certified reading specialist or an individual with
advanced training or specialization in literacy
instruction, if one is available, and
e. the school principal or vice principal.
4. A school district shall notify the parent or legal guardian
of any student in kindergarten or first, second, or third grade who
exhibits a deficiency in reading at any time based on the screening
instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of this section.
The notification shall occur no later than thirty (30) fifteen (15)
days after the identification of the deficiency in reading. Parents
of students who receive a reading intervention plan shall be
notified every two (2) weeks of the student's progress and ongoing
goals. Such bi-weekly updates shall include home support
suggestions.
5. The State Board of Education in consultation with the
Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability shall annually
define and set benchmarks that align with screening instrument
results to identify intervention tiers within a reading intervention
plan. Such benchmarks shall include proficient, basic, below basic,
and deficient.

Req. No. 14012 Page 8

6. Reading intervention shall not be provided solely by digital
technology. Reading intervention shall include a majority of direct
instruction from a teacher, specialist, or literacy coach and shall
be led by a teacher or specialist trained in the science of reading.
7. Retired teachers shall be permitted to contract with the
State Department of Education as literacy coaches for purposes of
assisting students in accordance with their reading intervention
plans.
E. 1. Every school district shall adopt and implement a
district strong readers plan which has had input from school
administrators, teachers, and parents and legal guardians and if
possible a reading specialist, and which shall be submitted
electronically to and approved by the State Board of Education. The
plan shall be updated annually. School districts shall not be
required to electronically submit the annual updates to the Board if
the last plan submitted to the Board was approved and expenditures
for the program include only expenses relating to individual and
small group tutoring, purchase of and training in the use of
screening and assessment measures, summer school programs, and
Saturday school programs. If any expenditure for the program is
deleted or changed or any other type of expenditure for the program
is implemented, the school district shall be required to submit the
latest annual update to the Board for approval. The district strong
readers plan shall include a plan for each site which includes an
Req. No. 14012 Page 9

anal ysis of the data provided by the Oklahoma School Testing Program
and other reading assessments utilized as required in this section,
and which outlines how each school site will comply with the
provisions of the Strong Readers Act.
2. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the
implementation and evaluation of the provisions of the Strong
Readers Act. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to,
an analysis of the data required in subsection L of this section.
F. 1. Any first-grade, second-grade, or third-grade student
who demonstrates proficiency in reading through a grade-level
appropriate screening instrument approved pursuant to subsection B
of this section shall not require a program of reading instruction
or an individual reading intervention plan. After a student has
demonstrated proficiency through a screening instrument, the
district shall provide notification to the parent or legal guardian
of the student that he or she has satisfied the requirements of the
Strong Readers Act. The district shall continue to monitor the
student in the next successive grade level to ensure he or she
maintains proficiency.
2. Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, if a third-grade
student is identified at any point of the academic year as having a
significant reading deficiency, which shall be defined as not
meeting grade-level targets on a screening instrument administered
pursuant to subsection A of this section, the district shall provide
Req. No. 14012 Page 10

the student with intensive intervention services for the appropriate
amount of the instructional day consistent with the individual
reading intervention plan developed pursuant to paragraph 2 of
subsection D of this section and as determined by the Student
Reading Proficiency Team. Intensive intervention services shall
continue until the student demonstrates proficiency at his or her
grade level based on a screening instrument administered pursuant to
subsection A of this section.
G. 1. a. If a first grade student has not met a proficient
benchmark, as defined by the State Department of
Education in accordance with paragraph 5 of subsection
D of this section, by either the mid-year or end-of-
year screening, the student's Reading Proficiency Team
shall meet prior to the end of the school year to
discuss retention of the student. Retention under
this paragraph shall be optional and based upon the
recommendations of at least five members of the
student's Reading Proficiency Team.
b. If the student is not retained in the first grade, the
student's family shall be provided with a summer
tutoring program and shall be scheduled for a re-
screening prior to the start of the subsequent school
year. The State Department of Education shall approve
one to two online or workbook-based summer tutoring
Req. No. 14012 Page 11

programs for use by students under this paragraph.
School districts shall also provide the student's
parents with a list of summer literacy programs
available if a summer academy as described in Section
1210.508E of this title is not offered by the school
district.
c. If the student's Reading Proficiency team determines
that retention of the student in the first grade is
necessary, the student shall be permitted to re-screen
prior to the start of the subsequent school year on a
date determined by school personnel if the re-
screening is requested by the student's parent, at
least five members of the student's Reading
Proficiency Team agree to the re-screening, and a
reasonable time has been provided for summer
remediation. After reviewing the results of a
student's re-screening, the Reading Proficiency Team
shall redetermine if retention is appropriate.
2. a. If a second grade student has not met a proficient
benchmark, as defined by the State Department of
Education in accordance with paragraph 5 of subsection
D of this section, by the end-of-year screening, the
student's Reading Proficiency Team shall meet prior to
the end of the school year to discuss retention of the
Req. No. 14012 Page 12

student. If the second grade student previously met
the mid-year screening proficiency benchmark and has
shown growth for the remainder of the year, the
Reading Proficiency Team may consider the student's
growth in their retention determination. Retention
under this paragraph shall be optional and based upon
the recommendations of at least five members of the
student's Reading Proficiency Team.
b. If the student is not retained in the second grade,
the student's family shall be provided with a summer
tutoring program and shall be scheduled for a re-
screening prior to the start of the subsequent school
year. The State Department of Education shall approve
one to two online or workbook-based summer tutoring
programs for use by students under this paragraph.
School districts shall also provide the student's
parents with a list of summer literacy programs
available if a summer academy as described in Section
1210.508E of this title is not offered by the school
district.
c. If the student's Reading Proficiency Team determines
that retention of the student in the second grade is
necessary, the student shall be permitted to re-screen
prior to the start of the subsequent school year on a
Req. No. 14012 Page 13

date determined by school personnel if the re-
screening is requested by the student's parent, at
least five members of the student's Reading
Proficiency Team agree to the re-screening, and a
reasonable time has been provided for summer
remediation. After reviewing the results of a
student's re-screening, the Reading Proficiency Team
shall redetermine if retention is appropriate.
3. a. If a third grade student has not met a proficient
benchmark, as defined by the State Department of
Education in accordance with paragraph 5 of subsection
D of this section, by the end-of-year screening, the
student's Reading Proficiency Team shall meet prior to
the end of the school year to discuss retention of the
student. Retention under this paragraph shall be
mandatory unless at least five members of the
student's Reading Proficiency Team recommend the
student move to fourth grade and one of the following
exceptions are met:
(1) the student has an Individual Education Plan or a
Section 504 plan,
(2) the student has a medical exemption such as a
severe illness or family emergency that did not

Req. No. 14012 Page 14

allow for adequate screening or classwork
completion, or
(3) the student was previously retained and has shown
an eighty percent (80%) improvement in grade
level work over their third grade year.
b. If the student is not retained in the third grade, the
student's family shall be provided with a summer
tutoring program and shall be scheduled for a re-
screening prior to the start of the subsequent school
year. The State Department of Education shall approve
one to two online or workbook-based summer tutoring
programs for use by students under this paragraph.
School districts shall also provide the student's
parents with a list of summer literacy programs
available if a summer academy as described in Section
1210.508E of this title is not offered by the school
district.
H. Each school district shall annually report in an electronic
format to the State Department of Education, the Office of
Educational Quality and Accountability, and the Secretary of
Education the number of students in kindergarten through third grade
per grade level who exhibit grade-level reading proficiency, the
number of students per grade level who received intensive
intervention services pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection F of
Req. No. 14012 Page 15

this section, the number of students per grade level who attended a
summer academy as provided for in Section 1210.508E of this title,
the number of students per grade level who exhibited improved
reading proficiency after completion of intensive intervention
services, and the number of students per grade level who are still
in need of intensive intervention services. The State Department of
Education shall publicly report the aggregate and district-specific
numbers submitted pursuant to this subsection on its website and
shall provide electronic copies of the report to the Governor,
Secretary of Education, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, Speaker
of the House of Representatives, and to the respective chairs of the
committees with responsibility for common education policy in each
legislative chamber.
H. I. The parent of any student who is found to have a reading
deficiency and is not meeting grade-level reading targets and has
been provided a program of reading instruction as provided for in
paragraph 1 of subsection D of this section shall be notified in
writing of the following:
1. That the student has been identified as having a substantial
deficiency in reading;
2. A description of the current services that are provided to
the student pursuant to subsection D of this section;
3. A description of the proposed intensive intervention
services and supports that will be provided to the student that are
Req. No. 14012 Page 16

desi gned to remediate the identified area of reading deficiency as
provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection F of this section;
4. That a student who is promoted to the fourth grade shall
receive supplemental intensive intervention services;
5. Strategies for parents to use in helping their child succeed
in reading proficiency; and
6. The grade-level performance scores of the student.
I. J. No student may be assigned to a grade level based solely
on age or other factors that constitute social promotion.
J. K. 1. Each school district board of education shall
annually publish on the school website and report electronically to
the State Department of Education, the Office of Educational Quality
and Accountability, and the Secretary of Education by September 1 of
each year the following information on the prior school year:
a. the policies and procedures adopted by the school
district board of education to implement the
provisions of this section. The information submitted
shall include expenditures related to implementing the
provisions of this section, the number of staff
implementing the provisions of this section, and
average daily classroom time devoted to implementing
the provisions of this section,
b. by grade, the number and percentage of all students in
kindergarten through third grade who did not meet
Req. No. 14012 Page 17

grade-level targets based on a screening instrument
administered pursuant to subsection A of this section,
c. by grade, the number and percentage of all students in
kindergarten through third grade who have been
enrolled in the district for fewer than two (2) years,
d. by grade, the number and percentage of students in
kindergarten through third grade who demonstrated
grade-level proficiency based on a screening
instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of
this section, and
e. by grade, the number and percentage of students in
kindergarten through third grade who are on an
individualized education program (IEP) in accordance
with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act
(IDEA) and who demonstrated grade-level proficiency
based on a screening instrument administered pursuant
to subsection A of this section or an alternative
assessment prescribed by the student's IEP.
2. The State Department of Education shall establish a uniform
format for school districts to report the information required in
this subsection. The format shall be developed with input from
school districts and shall be provided not later than ninety (90)
days prior to the annual due date. The Department shall annually
compile the information required, along with state-level summary
Req. No. 14012 Page 18

info rmation, and electronically report the information to the
public, the Governor, the Secretary of Education, the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
K. L. The State Department of Education shall provide technical
assistance as needed to aid school districts in administering the
provisions of the Strong Readers Act.
L. M. On or before January 31 of each year, the State
Department of Education shall electronically submit to the Governor,
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and members of the committees with responsibility
over common education in both houses of the Legislature a Strong
Readers Report which shall include, but is not limited to, trend
data detailing three (3) years of data, disaggregated by student
subgroups to include economically disadvantaged, major racial or
ethnic groups, students with disabilities, and English language
learners, as appropriate for the following:
1. The statewide aggregate number and percentage of students in
kindergarten through third grade determined to be at risk for
reading difficulties compared to the total number of students
enrolled in each grade;
2. The statewide aggregate number and percentage of students in
kindergarten who continue to be at risk for reading difficulties as

Req. No. 14012 Page 19

dete rmined by the year-end administration of the screening
instrument required in subsection A of this section;
3. The statewide aggregate number and percentage of students in
kindergarten through third grade who have successfully completed
their program of reading instruction and are reading on grade level
as determined by the results of screening instruments administered
pursuant to subsection A of this section;
4. The statewide aggregate and district-specific number and
percentage of students that meet or do not meet grade-level targets
for reading based on screening instruments administered pursuant to
subsection A of this section;
5. The amount of funds received by each district for
implementation of the Strong Readers Act;
6. An evaluation and narrative interpretation of the report
data analyzing the impact of the Strong Readers Act on students'
ability to read at grade level;
7. The type of reading instruction practices and methods
currently being used by school districts in the state;
8. Socioeconomic information, access to reading resources
outside of school, and screening for and identification of learning
disabilities for students not reading at the appropriate grade level
in kindergarten and first through third grade;
9. By grade level, the types of intensive intervention efforts
being conducted by school districts for students who are not on an
Req. No. 14012 Page 20

IEP and who are not reading at the appropriate grade level and for
students who are on an IEP and who are not reading at the
appropriate grade level; and
10. Any recommendations for improvements or amendments to the
Strong Readers Act.
The State Department of Education may contract with an
independent entity for the reporting and analysis requirements of
this subsection.
M. N. Copies of the results of the screening instruments
administered pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be made
a part of the permanent record of each student.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-122.3, as
last amended by Section 162, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 6-122.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-122.3. A. The State Board of Education shall grant
an alternative placement teaching certificate to a person who makes
application to the Board and meets the following criteria:
1. a. holds at least a baccalaureate degree from an
institution whose accreditation is recognized by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and has
attained a retention grade point average of not less
than 2.50 on a 4.0 scale, or
b. has successfully completed a terminal degree, such as
a doctorate of philosophy, a doctorate in education,
Req. No. 14012 Page 21

professional doctorates, a master of fine arts degree
or a master of library science degree, from an
institution accredited by a national or regional
accrediting agency which is recognized by the
Secretary of the United States Department of
Education. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall be consulted to verify other terminal
degrees, or
c. holds at least a baccalaureate degree from an
institution whose accreditation is recognized by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and has
qualified work experience in a field that corresponds
to an area of certification as determined by the State
Board of Education, and
d. in addition to the requirements of subparagraphs a, b
and c of this paragraph, has demonstrated competency
or completed a major in a field that corresponds to an
area of specialization for an Elementary-Secondary
Certificate or a Secondary Certificate as determined
by the State Board of Education or a vocational-
technical certificate as recommended by the Oklahoma
Department of Career and Technology Education;
2. Declares the intention to earn standard certification by
means of an alternative placement program in not more than three (3)
Req. No. 14012 Page 22

year s. The State Board of Education shall determine the subject
matter and the number of clock or semester hours required for the
professional education component for each person making application
for an alternative placement teaching certificate based on the
criteria of paragraph 1 of this subsection.
The State Board of Education shall establish a core minimum of
six (6) semester hours or ninety (90) clock hours and a maximum of
eighteen (18) semester hours or two hundred seventy (270) clock
hours for the professional education component.
The requirements set forth in this subsection shall exclude all
student teaching requirements pursuant to the provisions of
subsection E of this section;
3. Has passed the subject area portion of the competency
examination required in Section 6-187 of this title in the area of
specialization for which certification is sought; and
4. Either presents a document from an accredited public school
district in this state offering employment in the area of
specialization for which certification is sought on condition that
the person enroll in an alternative placement program approved by
the State Board of Education or declares the intention to seek
employment as a teacher at an accredited public school district in
this state. The certificate granted pursuant to this subsection
shall be considered a "valid certificate of qualification" for the
purposes of Sections 6-107 and 6-108 of this title, and the holder
Req. No. 14012 Page 23

of t he certificate shall be considered an inductee for the purposes
of Section 6-195 of this title.
B. An alternative placement teaching certificate shall be
renewed for not more than a maximum of three (3) years upon
presentation of a document from an accredited public school district
in this state offering renewed employment in the same area of
specialization and a document from a teacher education institution
verifying satisfactory progress in an appropriate alternative
placement program.
C. Persons enrolled in an alternative placement program shall:
1. Have never been denied admittance to a teacher education
program approved by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education,
the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools and by the
Oklahoma Commission for Teacher Preparation to offer teacher
education programs, nor have enrolled in and subsequently failed
courses necessary to successfully meet the minimum requirements of
the program, except those persons who hold a certificate;
2. Have on file with the director of teacher education at an
Oklahoma institution of higher education a plan for meeting standard
certification requirements within three (3) years; and
3. Participate in an induction program as required in Section
6-195 of this title and have the same duties and responsibilities as
other inductees.

Req. No. 14012 Page 24

D. The State Board of Education may grant an exception to the
requirements for certification and, upon demonstration by an
individual of specific competency in the subject area of
specialization, may grant a certificate to the individual. The
State Board may establish other requirements necessary to grant
exceptions.
E. The State Board of Education, in consultation with the
Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability, may grant an
exception to the requirement to complete a subject area examination
for initial certification in a field which does not require an
advanced degree pursuant to this section if the candidate has an
advanced degree in a subject that is substantially comparable to the
content assessed on a subject area examination. The degree shall be
from an institution accredited by a national or regional accrediting
agency which is recognized by the Secretary of the U.S. Department
of Education. The Commission shall provide the Board with the
necessary information to determine comparability.
F. Student teaching and a prestudent teaching field experience
shall not be required of alternative placement program participants
for standard certification.
G. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules
authorizing adjunct teachers who shall be persons with distinguished
qualifications in their field. Adjunct teachers shall not be
required to meet standard certification. A person employed as an
Req. No. 14012 Page 25

adju nct teacher pursuant to this subsection who does not hold a
valid certificate to teach shall not be considered a teacher as
defined by Section 1-116 of this title. Noncertified adjuncts shall
be prohibited from teaching in early childhood education,
mathematics, reading, and other core tested subjects in kindergarten
through sixth grade. Noncertified adjuncts shall be prohibited from
teaching in schools that do not meet numeracy and literacy
proficiency targets.
H. Each teacher education institution shall provide the
Oklahoma Commission for Teacher Preparation an annual report of
information as specified by the Commission regarding participation
in the alternative placement programs offered by the institution.
I. The Oklahoma Commission for Teacher Preparation shall not
accredit, renew the accreditation of, or otherwise approve any
teacher education program of any institution of higher education in
this state that has not implemented alternative placement programs
in at least four areas of specialization including mathematics,
science and a foreign language. Each institution shall allow
individuals who meet the criteria of subsections A and C of this
section to be:
1. Admitted to an alternative placement program without further
qualification; and
2. Offered the opportunity to complete the requirements for
standard certification set forth in subsection A of this section
Req. No. 14012 Page 26

duri ng the summer preceding and the summer following the first year
of teaching with an alternative placement teaching certificate. Any
person seeking standard certification through an alternative
placement program shall be permitted to take necessary courses
during regular semesters if offered.
J. The criteria specified in subsection I of this section can
be met through a cooperative arrangement entered into by two or more
institutions of higher education.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14012 SW 01/06/26









Req. No. 14012 Page 27